Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

1-2-201. Registration required - deadlines - additional identifying information to be provided by first-time registrants.

No person shall be permitted to cast a regular ballot at any election without first having been registered within the time and in the manner required by the provisions of this article. No charge shall be made for registration.

Each elector registering shall sign his or her name on the registration record or, if unable to write, shall make a personal mark or be provided assistance to make such a mark by the county clerk and recorder or any other person authorized by the county clerk and recorder or the elector. The elector shall answer the questions required by section 1-2-204 and shall complete the self-affirmation required by section 1-2-205.

Any other provisions of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, an elector is permitted to vote in any primary, presidential, general, coordinated, special legislative, municipal, congressional vacancy, special district, or other election if he or she timely registers to vote before or on the date of such election.

An elector may timely register to vote by:

Submitting an application through a voter registration drive no later than twenty-two days before the election; except that, if the twenty-second day before an election is a Saturday, Sunday, state legal holiday, or federal holiday recognized by the United States postal service, the elector is permitted to register on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, state legal holiday, or federal holiday recognized by the United States postal service;

Registering through a high school, in accordance with part 4 of this article 2;

Submitting an application through the mail, a voter registration agency, a local driver's license examination facility, or the online voter registration system established pursuant to section 1-2-202.5 (7)(c), through the eighth day prior to an election; except that, if the eighth day before an election is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the elector is permitted to register on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday;

Appearing in-person at the elector's county clerk and recorder's office at any time during which registration is permitted at the office; or

Appearing in-person at a voter service and polling center pursuant to section 1-2-217.7 at any time during which the voter service and polling center is open, including on election day.

To receive a ballot by mail for an election conducted under this code, an elector must submit his or her voter registration application on or before the eighth day before the election.

An elector who submits a voter registration form and has not previously voted in the state shall:

Submit with the voter registration form a copy of identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5), the elector's driver's license number, or the last four digits of the elector's social security number; or

Submit a copy of identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5) with the elector's mail ballot in accordance with section 1-7.5-107 (3.5).

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 638, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1752, § 7, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 1735, §§ 10, 11, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 471, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 757, § 4, effective May 20; (3) amended, p. 1389, § 6, effective June 4.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1395, § 6, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 1430, § 6, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 688, § 8, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(3)(b)(I) and (3)(b)(III) amended and (4) added, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 556, § 3, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(5) added, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 567, § 7, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(3)(b)(I) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1630, § 2, effective June 21.

1-2-202. Registration by county clerk and recorder.

The county clerk and recorder shall register any eligible elector residing in any precinct in the state of Colorado who appears in person at any office regularly maintained by the county clerk and recorder and staffed by regular employees at any time. If the elector resides in a county other than where he or she is registering, the registration shall be forwarded to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the elector resides.

Each municipal clerk shall serve as a deputy registrar. The municipal clerk shall register any eligible elector who appears in person at the municipal clerk's primary office at any time during which registration is permitted in the office of the county clerk and recorder. The municipal clerk shall deliver the new registration records to the office of the county clerk and recorder either in person or by mail no later than the tenth day of each month for the month immediately prior and in person on the day following the last day for registration preceding any election for which registration is required.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1753, § 8, effective January 1, 1995.)

If the county clerk and recorder finds that a precinct is composed of three percent or more non-English-speaking eligible electors, the county clerk and recorder shall take affirmative action to recruit full-time or part-time staff members who are fluent in the language used by the eligible electors and in English. The action shall be conducted through voluntarily donated public service notices in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, particularly those media which serve those non-English-speaking persons.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 471, § 3, effective July 1, 1997.)

Registration records for any election shall include all those electors who have registered up to and including election day.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 639, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1397, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1151, § 6, effective July 1; (1), (2), (3), and (7) amended, p. 1753, § 8, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1), (2), and (7) amended, p. 821, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1), (2), (6), and (7) amended, p. 471, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 757, § 5, effective May 20.

L. 2010:

(5) repealed, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 829, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2013:

(7) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 688, § 9, effective May 10.

1-2-202.5. Online voter registration - online changes in elector information.

An elector may register to vote, and a registered elector may change his or her residence in the registration record or change or withdraw his or her affiliation, by completing an electronic form on the official website of the secretary of state if the elector's signature is stored in digital form in the database systems maintained by the department of state pursuant to section 1-2-301 (1) or is accessible to the department of state in accordance with the requirements of section 1-2-302 (6), or if the elector provides the last four digits of the elector's social security number and the number can be validated through the department of revenue pursuant to section 1-2-302 (6.7).

The official website referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be fully secure. The website shall maintain the confidentiality of all users and preserve the integrity of the data submitted. Further specifications regarding the security of the website may be promulgated by the secretary by rule in accordance with the provisions of section 1-1-107 (2)(a).

(1.5) A person may preregister pursuant to section 1-2-101 (2) on the official website referenced in, and in accordance with the signature requirements of, subsection (1) of this section, and any person that has preregistered may change his or her information on the registration record by completing an electronic form on the official website referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

The secretary of state shall make available on the secretary of state's official website electronic forms for persons to apply to register to vote and for a registered elector to change his or her residence or change or withdraw his or her affiliation.

The electronic voter registration form must include:

The questions "Are you a citizen of the United States of America?", "Are you at least sixteen years of age?", "Do you understand that you must be at least seventeen years old and turning eighteen years old on or before the date of the next general election to be eligible to vote in a primary election, and at least eighteen years old to be eligible to vote in any other election?", "Have you resided in Colorado for at least twenty-two days immediately prior to the election?","Do you reside in the precinct in which you intend to register?", "Is the address you have listed your sole legal place of residence for purposes of voting?", and "Do you affirm that you will not cast more than one ballot in any election?" and places for the elector to input answers to the questions.

Following the questions listed in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the form shall include the statement "If you checked 'no' in response to any of these questions, do not complete this application because you do not qualify as an eligible elector in accordance with section 1-2-101, Colorado Revised Statutes.".

The questions specified in section 1-2-204 (2) with places for the elector to input information in response to the questions;

A place for the elector to input additional information, as determined by the secretary of state, necessary to locate the elector's signature in the database systems specified in subsection (1) of this section and a place for the elector to assent to the use of the signature for voter registration purposes.

A place for the elector, in the alternative, to enter the last four digits of the elector's social security number to be validated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and to upload a signature electronically.

The self-affirmation required under section 1-2-205; and

A statement that notifies the user of the website that it is against the law to knowingly submit false information or to tamper with another person's voter registration information.

The electronic form for a registered elector to change his or her residence shall include the information required by section 1-2-216 (1).

The electronic form for a registered elector to change or withdraw his or her affiliation shall include the information required by section 1-2-219 (1).

Repealed.

In addition to any other requirements of this section, in order for a registered elector to access the electronic form to change his or her residence or change or withdraw his or her affiliation, the registered elector shall submit his or her birth date and, if the elector wishes to state them, the last four digits of his or her social security number.

The signature requirement of section 1-2-201 (2) is met by an elector's assent on the electronic application to the use of his or her signature for voter registration purposes, the return of an elector's signature in response to a notice sent pursuant to subsection (7)(a) or (7)(b) of this section, or the return of an elector's signature and copy of the elector's identification pursuant to section 1-7.5-107.3 (1.5).

The county clerk and recorder shall determine if the information submitted on the electronic form is complete prior to approving a new registration or approving an elector's change in residence or change in or withdrawal of his or her affiliation.

When a person completes an electronic voter registration form in accordance with subsection (3) of this section and is qualified to register based on the information provided in the form, the county clerk and recorder shall search for the elector's signature in the database systems specified in subsection (1) of this section. If the signature is found, the county clerk and recorder shall approve the new registration pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and shall add the elector to the computerized statewide voter registration list maintained by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-2-301 (1).
(7) (a) (I) When a person completes an electronic voter registration form in accordance with subsection (3) of this section and is qualified to register based on the information provided in the form, the county clerk and recorder shall search for the elector's signature in the database systems specified in subsection (1) of this section. If the signature is found, the county clerk and recorder shall approve the new registration pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and shall add the elector to the computerized statewide voter registration list maintained by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-2-301 (1).

If a signature is not found, but the elector provided the last four digits of the elector's social security number, the county clerk and recorder shall:

Approve the new registration pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and shall add the elector to the computerized statewide voter registration list maintained by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-2-301 (1); and

Send to the elector's address of record, by nonforwardable mail, notice that the elector has been registered to vote, a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the elector may return a signature, and information on how the elector can upload a signature electronically.

When a registered elector completes an electronic form to change his or her residence or change or withdraw his or her affiliation, the county clerk and recorder shall search for the registered elector's signature in the database systems specified in subsection (1) of this section. If the signature is found, the county clerk and recorder shall approve the change in status pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and shall make the changes indicated on the electronic form in the computerized statewide voter registration list maintained by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-2-301 (1).

If a signature is not found, but the elector provided the last four digits of the elector's social security number, the county clerk and recorder shall:

Approve the change in status pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and shall make the changes indicated on the electronic form in the computerized statewide voter registration list maintained by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-2-301 (1); and

Send to the elector's address of record, by nonforwardable mail, notice of the change in status, a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the elector may return a signature, and information on how the elector can upload a signature electronically.

A person attempting to register or update his or her residence through the online voter registration system after the eighth day before an election shall be registered and immediately informed that the person must instead visit a voter service and polling center to receive a ballot for the election.

A change or withdrawal of affiliation made in accordance with this section applies to an election if the elector completes the electronic form no later than twenty-two days before the election; except that, if the twenty-second day before an election is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the change or withdrawal applies if made by the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

If a notice provided under subsection (7)(a)(II) or (7)(b)(II) of this section is returned as undeliverable within twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration or change in status is canceled and the person is deemed never to have registered or changed status. If the notice is returned as undeliverable after twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration is marked inactive.

Notwithstanding subsection (7)(d)(I) of this section, if a person votes in an election after submitting the application for registration or change in status but before the notice is returned as undeliverable, the person's registration or change in status shall not be canceled and the registration shall not be marked inactive.

No later than July 1, 2011, the secretary of state shall make available on the secretary of state's official website a link to the department of revenue's official website, whereby an elector may change his or her address information on file with the department of revenue for driver's license or identification card purposes.

No sooner than November 1, 2011, and no later than January 1, 2012, the secretary of state shall make available on the secretary of state's official website a link to the department of revenue's official website, whereby an elector may change his or her address information for state income tax purposes.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1160), ch. 263, p. 1205, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2010:

(8) added, (HB 10-1045), ch. 317, p. 1478, § 1, effective July 1, 2011.

L. 2013:

(1)(a), (2), IP(3), (3)(a)(I), (4)(d), (6), (7)(b), and (7)(c) amended and (4)(c) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 688, § 10, effective May 10; (1.5) added, (HB 13-1135), ch. 184, p. 678, § 2; effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(4)(d), (7)(b), and (7)(c)(I) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 556, § 4, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(3)(b), (3)(d), and (7)(c)(II) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 567, § 8, effective May 18.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 376, § 35, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(3)(a)(I) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3006, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(a), (3)(c), (5), (7)(a), (7)(b), and (7)(c)(II) amended and (7)(d) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1631, § 3, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsections (1)(a) and (2), the introductory portion to subsection (3), and subsections (3)(a)(I), (4)(d), (6), (7)(b), and (7)(c) were amended and subsection (4)(c) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-2-203. Registration on Indian reservations.

The secretary or secretary's designee of any tribal council of an Indian tribe located on a federal reservation serves as a deputy registrar only for registration purposes for the county in which the reservation is located. The secretary of the tribal council or the secretary's designee shall register any eligible elector residing in any precinct in the county who provides a complete voter registration application to the secretary of the tribal council at any time during which registration is permitted in the office of the county clerk and recorder. The secretary of the tribal council shall forward the registration records to the county clerk and recorder, either in person or by certified mail, on or before the fifteenth day of each month; except that, within twenty-two days before an election, the secretary of the tribal council shall appear in person or transmit daily to deliver any registration records to the county clerk and recorder. Within eight days before an election, the secretary of the tribal council shall accept an application and inform the applicant that he or she must go to a voter service and polling center in order to vote in that election.

An eligible elector who lives on an Indian reservation, but who does not have a residence address recognized by the United States postal service, may register to vote using, as his or her residence address, the address of the tribal council headquarters or any other address approved by the secretary of the tribal council.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 640, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1398, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 568, § 9, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3006, § 5, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-202.5 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-2-204. Questions answered by elector - rules.

Repealed.

In addition, each elector shall correctly answer the following:

The elector's name in full;

The elector's place of residence, including municipal address with street number or, if there is no street number, by legal description of the land upon which the residence sits, including lot, block, addition, division, or subdivision, as applicable. In all other cases, the residence shall be described by the section or subdivision in the township and range as established and numbered by the United States government survey. If the place of residence is an apartment house, rooming house, dormitory, hotel, or motel, the number of the floor and the number of the apartment or room shall also be given. Except as allowed by section 1-2-102 (1)(a), no vacant lot or business address shall be considered a residence. A post office box number shall not be used as a place of residence for the purposes of this subsection (2).

Whether the elector is a citizen of the United States;

The elector's gender identity, if the elector wishes to state it;

The elector's date of birth;

The elector's deliverable mailing address if different from the elector's address of record;

The address where the elector wishes to receive his or her ballot if different from the address of record;

The elector's current and valid Colorado driver's license number, the number of the current and valid identification card issued to the elector in accordance with part 3 of article 2 of title 42, or the last four digits of the elector's social security number. If the elector does not have a social security number or a current and valid Colorado driver's license or identification card, the elector shall answer that he or she does not have a social security number or a current and valid Colorado driver's license or identification card.

Repealed.

Whether or not the elector is registered to vote in another county of this state;

Whether or not the elector was registered to vote in another state;

The elector's affiliation, if any, if the eligible elector desires to affiliate with any political party or political organization. If this question is not answered, the elector shall be registered as "unaffiliated". Only the eligible elector personally shall declare the eligible elector's affiliation.

In the case of an unaffiliated elector, the name of the political party, if any, whose primary election ballot the elector desires to receive in the mail;

Repealed.

The question "Do you affirm that you meet the voter registration qualifications and that the information you have provided in this application is true to the best of your knowledge and belief?".

(2.5) If an applicant for voter registration has not been issued a current and valid Colorado driver's license, a current and valid identification card issued by the department of revenue in accordance with the requirements of part 3 of article 2 of title 42, C.R.S., or a social security number, the secretary of state shall assign the applicant a number that will serve to identify the applicant for voter registration purposes. Insofar as the department of state has created a computerized statewide voter registration list in accordance with the requirements of part 3 of this article and the list assigns unique identifying numbers to registrants, the number assigned under this subsection (2.5) shall be the unique identifying number assigned under the list.

(2.7) The form used for registration of electors shall contain a statement that the applicant must comply with the requirements of paragraph (f.5) of subsection (2) of this section, that an applicant who is qualified to vote in this state but does not have a driver's license, state-issued identification card, or social security number may still register to vote, and that the secretary of state will assign an identifying number to such an applicant for voter registration purposes.

If the county clerk and recorder has reasonable cause to believe that an applicant has falsified any answers to the questions set forth in this section, the county clerk and recorder shall certify the same to the district attorney for investigation and appropriate action.

If the elector states that the elector's present address is the elector's sole legal residence and that the elector claims no other place as the elector's legal residence and if the elector meets the qualifications of section 1-2-101, the county clerk and recorder shall proceed to register the elector.

If the elector does not comply with the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the county clerk and recorder shall not register the elector.

If the registration record of a registered elector does not contain the last four digits of the elector's social security number, the county clerk and recorder shall request the elector to provide the last four digits of the elector's social security number. The request may be made of the registered elector by the county clerk and recorder:

In any written communication by mail from the county clerk and recorder to the registered elector;

At any voter service and polling center in the registered elector's county;

Repealed.

In materials to be returned by the registered elector with a mail ballot.

No registered elector shall be prohibited from voting at any election for failure to provide the last four digits of the elector's social security number or the elector's full social security number.

Any social security number or the last four digits of a social security number of an elector that is obtained by the county clerk and recorder from such elector pursuant to this section shall be held confidential and shall not be published or be open to or available for public inspection. The county clerk and recorder shall develop appropriate security measures to ensure the confidentiality of such numbers.

The last four digits of a social security number described in this section shall not be considered a social security number for purposes of section 7 of the federal "Privacy Act of 1974", Pub.L. 93-579.

(4.5) This section does not apply to a covered voter, as defined in section 1-8.3-102, who is registering to vote pursuant to section 1-8.3-107.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to determine the identity of a resident of a group residential facility, as defined in section 1-1-104 (18.5), and any rules necessary to ensure the consistent application of such identification rules.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 641, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2)(j) amended, p. 1398, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1753, § 9, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2)(f) amended, p. 822, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2)(i) amended, p. 472, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(f.5) and (4) added and (2)(g) amended, p. 279, §§ 1, 2, effective April 14.

L. 99:

(2)(f) amended and (2)(k) added, p. 279, § 3, effective August 4; (2)(j) amended, p. 158, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

(2)(f.5) amended and (2.5) added, p. 2072, § 8, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(2)(c), (2)(d), and (2)(f.5) amended, p. 426, § 2, effective April 13; (2)(f.5), IP(4)(a), (4)(a)(I), and (4)(b) amended and (4)(d) added, p. 1051, § 2, effective May 21.

L. 2006:

(2)(f.5) amended and (2.7) and (3)(c) added, pp. 2028, 2029, §§ 1, 2, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(4)(a)(IV) amended, p. 1775, § 2, effective June 1; (2)(f.5) amended, p. 1968, § 4, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(5) added, (HB 09-1336), ch. 261, p. 1198, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(2)(d) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 677, § 3, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(2)(g) and (4)(a)(III) repealed, (2)(k), IP(4)(a), (4)(a)(II), and (4)(a)(IV) amended, and (2)(l) added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 690, § 11, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(1) repealed, IP(2) and (2)(d) amended, and (4.5) added, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 568, § 10, effective May 18.

L. 2017:

(2)(j.5) added, (SB 17-305), ch. 216, p. 841, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(2)(f.3) added, (2)(i) amended, and (2)(k) repealed, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1604, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(2)(f.5) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3006, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 22-152), ch. 100, p. 477, § 2, effective April 13.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-203 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsections (2)(g) and (4)(a)(III) were repealed, subsection (2)(k), the introductory portion to subsection (4)(a), and subsections (4)(a)(II) and (4)(a)(IV) were amended, and subsection (2)(l) was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-2-205. Self-affirmation made by elector.

The registration record to be signed by the elector shall bear the following statement:

To swear or affirm falsely as to your qualifications to register to vote.

Each elector making application for registration or preregistration shall make the following self-affirmation: "I, ...., affirm that I am a citizen of the United States; I have been a resident of Colorado for at least twenty-two days immediately before an election I intend to vote in; I am at least sixteen years old; and I understand that I must be at least seventeen and turning eighteen on or before the date of the next general election to be eligible to vote in a primary election, and at least eighteen to be eligible to vote in any other election. I further affirm that the residence address I provided is my sole legal place of residence. I certify under penalty of perjury that the information I have provided on this application is true to the best of my knowledge and belief; and that I have not, nor will I, cast more than one ballot in any election.".

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1754, § 10, effective January 1, 1995.)

The elector shall sign the registration record as evidence of the affirmation made by the elector.

This section does not apply to a person registered in accordance with section 1-2-213.3 or 1-2-502.5.

WARNING:
IT IS A CLASS 1 MISDEMEANOR:

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 643, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1754, § 10, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 691, § 12, effective May 10; (2) amended, (HB 13-1135), ch. 184, p. 678, § 3, effective August 7; (2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 691, § 12, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 557, § 5, effective May 9.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-150), ch. 261, p. 1600, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(2) amended and (5) added, (SB 19-235), ch. 329, p. 3056, § 9, effective August 2; (2) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3007, § 7, effective August 2.

1-2-206. Declaration of party affiliation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 643, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1152, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) repealed, p. 1736, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 165, § 28, effective August 4.

1-2-207. Affidavit registration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 644, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1754, §§ 11, 48, effective January 1, 1995.

1-2-208. Registration by federal postcard application - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 644, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1755, § 12, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 822, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 757, § 6, effective May 20.

L. 2003:

(1), (2), and (3) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1332, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 673, § 5, effective May 13.

1-2-209. Registration of citizens who reside outside the United States - federal law. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 645, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1755, § 13, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 822, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 475, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 758, § 7, effective May 20.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (3) amended, p. 1333, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1776, § 3, effective June 1; (1.5) added, p. 1041, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 673, § 5, effective May 13.

1-2-209.5. Absent uniformed services and overseas electors - simultaneous voter registration and absentee ballot application - designated office - cooperation with military units. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1334, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1776, § 4, effective June 1; (2)(b) amended, p. 1041, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (HB 11-1219), ch. 176, p. 673, § 5, effective May 13.

1-2-210. Registration for congressional vacancy elections.

Except as otherwise provided in section 1-4-401.5, in any congressional vacancy election, the time and method of registration and performance of other acts shall be as provided in this part 2 for general elections. In every other respect, the election shall be held in conformity with this part 2 as far as practicable. Any congressional vacancy election shall be called in sufficient time before the date of the election to permit the county clerk and recorder to comply with the provisions of this part 2.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 646, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 409, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-211 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-2-210.5. Registration of and voting by persons in custody of division of youth services - definitions.

In the case of any individual committed to a juvenile facility and in the custody of the division of youth services in the department of human services created in section 19-2.5-1501 (1) who is eighteen years of age or older on the date of the next election, the administrator of the facility in which the individual is committed shall facilitate the registration for voting purposes of, and voting by, the individual. In connection with this requirement, the administrator shall provide the individual information regarding the individual's voting rights and how the individual may register to vote and cast a mail ballot, provide the individual with voter information materials upon the request of the individual, and ensure that any mail ballot cast by the individual is timely delivered to the designated election official.

The administrator and the secretary of state shall post the type or kind of verification satisfying the requirements of section 1-1-104 (19.5)(d) in a prominent place on the public websites maintained by the department of human services and the secretary, respectively. The secretary shall provide notice to the county clerk and recorders as well as other designated election officials throughout the state that such verification constitutes an acceptable form of identification under section 1-1-104 (19.5) permitting the individuals possessing such identification to register to vote and cast a ballot.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an administrator is exempt from any restriction under law on the number of mail or mail-in ballots an eligible elector may deliver in person to the designated election official.

The administrator shall forward applications made under this section on a weekly basis, or on a daily basis during the last week allowed for registration prior to any election, to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the facility is located, and, if the applicant resides in a different county from the facility, the application must then be forwarded to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the applicant resides.

As used in this section:

"Administrator" means the administrator, or the administrator's designee, of the division of youth services created in section 19-2.5-1501 (1), a residential facility operated by the division of youth services, or a residential facility that contracts with the division of youth services in which a person committed to the department of human services is confined and eligible to register to vote and cast a ballot.

"Voter information materials" means the following documents, as applicable to the election for which the individual seeks to register to vote and cast a ballot:

Any forms used to register an elector under this part 2;

An application for a mail ballot pursuant to section 1-13.5-1002;

A copy of a ballot information booklet described in section 1-40-124.5; and

Any mailings to electors that are described in section 1-40-125.

Upon an administrator's written request to the legislative council staff or a county clerk and recorder for copies of the documents specified in sub-subparagraph (C) or (D) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the legislative council staff or county clerk and recorder, as applicable, shall timely provide copies of the documents to the administrator in a sufficient number to cover the number of individuals who are authorized to register and vote under this section and who are either residing in the administrator's facility or under the supervision of the administrator's program.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1038), ch. 28, p. 67, § 2, effective March 15.

L. 2014:

(1) and (5)(b)(I)(B) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 71, § 34, effective February 18.

L. 2017:

(1) and (5)(a) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1968, § 11, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(1) and (5)(a) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 707, § 3, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-2-211. Establishment and conduct of branch registration sites. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 647, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1755, § 14, effective January 1, 1995.

1-2-212. Mobile registration sites - definitions - establishment and conduct. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 648, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1756, § 15, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2)(b) amended, p. 823, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 472, § 5, effective July 1.